California statutes. Insurance Code
(d) Costs for the insurance are separately itemized in any billing statement for the insurance. However, if the portable electronics coverage is included with the purchase or lease of portable electronics or related services, the vendor shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the customer that the coverage is included with the purchase of the portable electronics or related services.

(e) The insurance is provided under an individual policy issued to the purchaser, or under a group or master policy issued to an organization licensed as a portable electronics insurance agent by an insurer authorized to
 transact the applicable kinds or types of insurance in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 7.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.661.

Charges for portable electronics insurance may be billed and collected by a portable electronics insurance agent licensee. A licensee shall not be required to maintain those funds in a segregated account if the insurer represented by the licensee has provided in writing that the funds need not be segregated from funds received by the portable electronics vendor on account of the sale or lease of portable electronics or related services or accessories. All funds received by a vendor from a customer for the sale of portable electronics insurance shall be considered funds held in trust by the vendor in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of the insurer. Licensees may receive compensation for billing and collection services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 8.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.67.

Under the authority of the portable electronics insurance agent license, a portable electronics insurance agent shall not do any of the following:

(a) Offer to sell insurance except in conjunction with, and incidental to, the business of selling portable electronics, their accessories, or related services.

(b) Advertise, represent, or otherwise portray itself or its endorsees as licensed insurers or property and casualty broker-agents.

(c) Pay any endorsee compensation based primarily on the number of customers electing coverage under the portable electronics insurance
 agent’s license. However, nothing in this code shall prohibit the payment of compensation to an endorsee of a portable electronics insurance agent for activities under the agent’s license that is incidental to their overall compensation. The incidental compensation shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15) per customer who purchases portable electronics insurance coverage.

(d) Unless lawfully transacting the business of insurance pursuant to a certificate of authority issued pursuant to Section 700 for the appropriate class, a person obligated to perform under a contract offered in or from this state that meets the definition of portable electronics insurance as set forth in Section 1758.69 shall be deemed to be unlawfully transacting the business of insurance and shall be subject to subdivision (b) of Section 700 and Section 12921.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 9.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.68.

Any insurer that provides insurance to be sold by an organization licensed as a portable electronics insurance agent shall file a copy of any individual policy issued to a purchaser, or any policy or certificate issued under a group or master policy to an organization licensed as a portable electronics insurance agent, with the commissioner, who shall make that policy available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 10.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.681.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) As used in this section, “portable electronics vendor policyholder” means a portable electronics insurance agent licensee pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1758.69.

(b) An insurer may terminate a portable electronics insurance policy or otherwise change the terms and conditions of a portable electronics insurance policy only upon providing the portable electronics vendor policyholder and enrolled customers with at least 30 calendar days’ written notice.

(c) If the insurer changes the terms and conditions of a policy of
 portable electronics insurance, the insurer shall provide the portable electronics vendor policyholder with a revised policy or endorsement and each enrolled customer with a revised certificate, endorsement, updated brochure, or other evidence indicating that a change in the terms and conditions has occurred and a summary of those changes.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), an insurer may terminate an enrolled customer’s enrollment under a portable electronics insurance policy upon 15 calendar days’ notice for discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation in obtaining coverage or in the presentation of a claim under the policy.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), an insurer may immediately terminate an enrolled customer’s enrollment under a portable electronics insurance
 policy without prior notice for any of the following:

(1) For nonpayment of premium.

(2) If the enrolled customer ceases to have an active service with the vendor of portable electronics.

(3) If the enrolled customer exhausts the aggregate limit of liability, if any, under the terms of the portable electronics insurance policy and the insurer sends notice of termination to the enrolled customer within 30 calendar days after exhaustion of the limit. However, if notice is not sent within 30 calendar days, enrollment shall continue notwithstanding the aggregate limit of liability until 30 calendar days from the date the insurer sends notice of termination to the enrolled customer.

(f) If a portable electronics insurance policy is terminated by a portable electronics vendor policyholder, the portable electronics vendor policyholder shall mail or deliver a written notice to each enrolled customer advising the enrolled customer of the termination of the policy and the effective date of termination. The written notice shall be mailed or delivered by the portable electronics vendor policyholder to the enrolled customer at least 30 days prior to the termination. However, if the notice is not sent within 30 calendar days, enrollment shall continue until 30 calendar days from the date the portable electronics vendor policyholder sends notice of termination to the enrolled customer or until a new portable electronics insurance policy is in effect.

(g) Whenever notice or correspondence with respect to a policy of
 portable electronics insurance is required pursuant to this section, it shall be in writing and sent within the notice period required pursuant to this section. Notices and correspondence shall be sent to the portable electronics vendor policyholder at the portable electronics vendor policyholder’s mailing address specified for that purpose and to its affected enrolled customers’ last known mailing addresses on file with the insurer or the portable electronics vendor policyholder. The insurer or portable electronics vendor policyholder shall maintain proof that the notice or correspondence was sent for not less than three years after that notice or correspondence was sent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 21.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.69.

As used in this article, the following definitions have the following meanings:

(a) “Endorsee” means an unlicensed employee or authorized representative of a portable electronics vendor.

(b) “Enrollment” means the process of soliciting or accepting enrollments or applications from a consumer under a portable electronics insurance policy, which includes informing the consumer of the availability of coverage, preparing and delivery of the certificate of insurance or notice of proposed insurance, or otherwise assisting the consumer in making an informed decision whether or not to elect to purchase portable electronics insurance.

(c) (1) “License period” means all of that two-year period beginning as described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), as applicable, and ending the second succeeding year on the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued.

(2) A license period shall be determined for each person as follows:

(A) Upon initial licensing, the license period shall start on the date the license is issued.

(B) For a subsequent license, the license period shall start on the first day following the month in which the initial license was issued.

(3) A license shall be renewed on or before the expiration date of the license period.

(d) (1) “Portable electronics” means all of the following:

(A) Personal, self-contained, easily carried by an individual, battery-operated electronic communication, viewing, listening, recording, gaming, computing, or global positioning devices, including cell or satellite phones, pagers, personal global positioning satellite units, portable computers, portable audio listening, video viewing or recording devices, digital cameras, video camcorders, portable gaming systems, docking stations, automatic answering devices, their accessories, and service related to the use of those devices.

(B) Any other electronic device that is portable in nature that the commissioner approves.

(2) “Portable electronics” does not include
 telecommunications switching equipment, transmission wires, cell site transceiver equipment, or other equipment and systems used by telecommunications companies to provide telecommunications service to consumers.

(e) (1) “Portable electronics insurance” means a contract providing coverage for the repair or replacement of portable electronics against any one or more of the following causes of loss: loss, theft, mechanical failure, malfunction, damage, or other applicable perils.

(2) “Portable electronics insurance” does not include any of the following:

(A) A service contract governed by Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 9855) of Chapter 20 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) A policy of insurance covering a
 seller’s or a manufacturer’s obligations under a warranty.

(C) A homeowner’s, renter’s, private passenger automobile, commercial multiperil, or similar policy.

(f) “Portable electronics insurance agent license” means an agent license issued to an individual or organization for the enrollment and sale of portable electronics insurance.

(g) “Portable electronics vendor” means any person in the business, directly or indirectly, of selling, reselling, soliciting, or leasing portable electronics, their accessories, and related services to customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 11.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.691.

Nothing in this article regulating the sale of portable electronics insurance shall be construed to impair or impede the application of any other law regulating the sale of portable electronics insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 12.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.692.

(a) Not less than 60 days before a permanent license will expire, the commissioner may use an electronic delivery method, including email or other similar electronic method of delivery, to deliver, or may mail, to the latest email or mailing address appearing on the commissioner’s records, an application to the licensee to renew the license of a portable electronics insurance agent for the
 appropriate succeeding license term. It is the licensee’s responsibility to renew, whether or not a renewal notice is received.

(b) The commissioner may accept a late renewal without penalty, provided that the licensee’s failure to comply is due to a clerical error or inadvertence.

(c) An application for renewal of a license may be filed on or before the expiration date. An application for renewal of an expired license may be filed after the expiration date and until that same month and date of the next succeeding year.

(d) The commissioner shall impose a penalty fee equal to one-half of the renewal fee for the portable electronics insurance agent license for any renewal that is filed after the expiration date of
 the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 33.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.693.

(a) This article shall become operative only upon a determination by the commissioner that the personnel positions needed to carry out the provisions of this article are in existence or have been authorized in the Budget Act of 2002 or a subsequent budget act.

(b) On and after January 1, 2003, the commissioner may accept applications from communications equipment vendors seeking licensure pursuant to this article. However, the commissioner shall not act upon the applications. If, prior to April 30, 2003, the commissioner receives 50 applications or less, the commissioner shall be deemed to have sufficient personnel to carry out the provisions of this article and this article shall immediately become operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Note: This section prescribes conditions for the operation of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16.3. Self-Service Storage Agents [1758.7. - 1758.792.]

1758.7.

(a) A self-service storage facility, or franchisee of a self-service storage facility, shall not offer or sell insurance unless it has complied with the requirements of this article and has been issued a license by the commissioner as provided in this article.

(b) The commissioner may issue to a self-service storage facility, or its franchisee, that has complied with the requirements of this article, a license that authorizes the self-service storage facility or its franchisee to offer or sell the types of insurance specified in Section 1758.75 in connection with and incidental to rental agreements on behalf of any insurer authorized to write those types of insurance policies in this
 state.

(c) (1) The license period shall be a two-year period beginning as described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), as applicable, and ending on the second succeeding year on the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued.

(2) The commencement of a license period shall be determined for each self-service storage facility or franchisee of a self-service storage facility, as follows:

(A) Upon initial licensing, the license period begins on the date the license is issued.

(B) Upon license renewal, the license period begins on the first day of the month following the month in which the initial license was
 issued.

(3) (A) Not less than 60 days before a permanent license will expire, the commissioner may use an electronic delivery method, including email or other similar electronic method of delivery, to deliver, or may mail, to the latest email or mailing address appearing on the commissioner’s records, an application to the licensee to renew the license for the appropriate succeeding license period. It is the licensee’s responsibility to renew whether or not a renewal application is received. The commissioner may accept a late renewal without penalty, provided that the licensee’s failure to comply is due to clerical error or inadvertence on the part of the department.

(B) The application for renewal of a license shall be filed on or before the expiration
 date.

(C) The application for renewal of an expired license may be filed after the expiration date and until the same month and day of the next succeeding year. A licensee who files the renewal application after the license has expired shall be charged, in addition to the renewal fee, a penalty of 50 percent of the renewal fee.

(d) The applicant for a license pursuant to this section shall submit an application fee upon initial application and upon renewal application of two hundred ninety-four dollars ($294).

(e) Costs associated with any enforcement action or investigation shall be paid for by the person or organization licensed pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 34.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.71.

(a) An applicant for a self-service storage agent license shall file the following documents with the commissioner:

(1) A written application for licensure signed by the applicant or an officer of the applicant in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(2) A certificate by the insurer that is to be named in the self-service storage agent license stating that the insurer has satisfied itself that the named applicant is trustworthy and competent to act as its agent for the limited purpose of offering or selling the types of insurance specified in Section 1758.75 in connection with, and incidental to, self-service storage rental agreements and that the insurer will appoint the applicant to act as its agent in reference to offering or selling those types of insurance if the applicant is licensed by the commissioner. The certification shall be subscribed by an officer or managing agent of the insurer on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Sections 1667, 1668, 1668.5, 1669, 1670, 1738, and 1739 apply to any application for or issuance of a license pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.72.

(a) Each self-service storage agent shall provide an insurance training program for its employees that shall meet the following minimum standards:

(1) Each employee shall receive instruction about the types of insurance specified in Section 1758.75 that are offered for sale to prospective renters.

(2) Each employee shall receive training about ethical sales practices.

(3) Each employee shall receive training about the disclosures to be given to prospective renters pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1758.76.

(b) Training materials used by or on behalf of the self-service storage facility to train its endorsee shall be submitted to the department at the time the applicant applies for a license under this article and whenever modified thereafter. Any changes to previously submitted training materials shall be submitted to the department with the changes highlighted 30 days prior to their use by the licensee. Training materials and changes in those materials submitted to the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed approved for use by the company unless the company is notified by the department to the contrary. Failure by a self-service storage facility to submit training materials or changes for department review, or use of unapproved or disapproved training materials shall constitute grounds for the denial of an application for license, nonrenewal of a license, or a suspension of a license, as appropriate.

(c) An employee may not be endorsed to a self-service storage agent license unless that employee is 18 years of age or older.

(d) The self-service storage facility, at the time it submits its self-service storage agent license application pursuant to Section 1758.71, shall establish a list of the names of all endorsees to its self-service storage agent license. The list shall be maintained by the self-service storage facility in a form prescribed by, or format acceptable to, the commissioner, and shall be updated annually. The list shall be retained by the self-service storage facility for three years and made available to the commissioner for review and inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.73.

Any employee of a licensee who has been trained pursuant to Section 1758.72 may act on behalf and under the supervision of the self-service storage facility agent in matters relating to the conduct of business under that agent’s license. The conduct of an employee or agent of a licensee acting within the scope of employment or agency shall be deemed the conduct of the self-service storage facility agent for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.74.

(a) If a licensee violates any provision of this article, the commissioner may do any of the following:

(1) After notice and hearing, revoke or suspend the self-service storage facility’s license.

(2) After notice and hearing, impose other penalties, including suspending the transaction of insurance at specific self-service storage facilities where violations of this article have occurred.

(3) Impose fines and penalties on the self-service storage agent for its conduct or that of its employees.

(b) If any person or persons sell insurance in connection with, or incidental to, self-service storage rental agreements, or
 hold themselves or an organization out as a self-service storage agent without obtaining the license required by this article, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order pursuant to Section 12921.8.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of Section 1748.5 are applicable to a self-service storage facility or its franchisee issued a license pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 35.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.75.

A self-service storage facility or its franchisee licensed under this article may act as a self-service storage agent for an authorized insurer only with respect to the following types of insurance and only in connection with, and incidental to, self-service storage rental agreements:

(a) Insurance that provides hazard insurance coverage to renters for the loss of, or damage to, tangible personal property in storage or in transit during the rental period.

(b) Any other coverage the commissioner may approve as meaningful and appropriate in connection with the rental of storage space.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.76.

A licensee shall not sell insurance pursuant to this article unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The self-service storage agent provides brochures or other written material to the prospective renter that does all of the following:

(1) Summarizes the material terms and conditions of coverage offered to renters, including the identity of the insurer.

(2) Describes the process for filing a claim, including a toll-free telephone number to report a claim.

(3) Discloses
 any additional information on the price, benefits, exclusions, conditions, or other limitations of the types of insurance specified in Section 1758.75 that the commissioner may by rule prescribe.

(4) Provide the licensee’s name, address, telephone number, and license number and the availability of the department’s toll-free consumer hotline.

(b) The self-service storage agent makes all of the following disclosures to the renter, which shall be acknowledged in writing by the renter, or displayed by clear and conspicuous signs that are posted at every location where rental agreements are executed, such as the counter where a renter would sign a rental agreement:

(1) That the purchase by the renter of the insurance is
 not required in order to rent storage space. However, the licensee’s employees may advise the renter that the self-service storage facility’s rental agreement may contain provisions requiring the renter to provide insurance on that renter’s property in the storage unit.

(2) That the insurance policies offered by the self-service storage agent may provide a duplication of coverage already provided by a renter’s homeowners insurance policy or by another source of coverage.

(3) That the self-service storage facility and its employees are not qualified or authorized to evaluate the adequacy of the purchaser’s existing insurance coverage.

(c) If a renter elects to purchase the coverage, evidence of coverage is stated
 on the face of the rental agreement or is provided to the renter.

(d) The insurance is provided under an individual, a group, or a master policy issued to the self-service storage agent by an insurer authorized to write the types of insurance specified in Section 1758.75 in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 36.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.77.

A licensee shall not be required to treat moneys collected from renters purchasing insurance pursuant to this article as funds received in a fiduciary capacity if the insurer represented by the licensee has provided in writing that the funds need not be segregated from funds received by the self-service storage agent if the charges for insurance coverage are itemized and incorporated as part of the rental agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.78.

A self-service storage agent shall not do any of the following:

(a) Offer to sell insurance except in conjunction with, and incidental to, authorized rental agreements.

(b) Advertise, represent, or otherwise portray itself or its employees as licensed insurers, insurance agents, or insurance brokers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.79.

Any insurer that provides insurance to be sold by a self-service storage facility or its franchisee under this article shall file a copy of the policy with the commissioner, who shall make that policy available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.791.

As used in this article:

(a) “Self-service storage facility” means a person or organization engaged in the business of providing leased or rented storage space to the public.

(b) “Storage space” means a room, unit, locker, or open space offered for rental to the public for temporary storage of personal belongings or light commercial goods.

(c) “Renter” means any person who obtains the use of storage space from a self-service storage company under the terms of a rental agreement.

(d) “Rental agreement” means any written agreement for the terms and conditions governing the use of a storage space provided by a self-service storage company.

(e) “Self-service storage agent” means a person or organization licensed pursuant to this article to offer insurance in connection with, and incidental to, rental agreements on behalf of an insurer authorized to write the types of insurance specified in Section 1758.75 in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.792.

The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this article which may include fee differentials for smaller, self-service storage facilities. The rules shall be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of rules shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16.6. Car Rental Agents [1758.8. - 1758.891.]

1758.8.

(a) A rental car company shall not offer or sell insurance unless it is licensed as an insurance agent or broker pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1631) or has complied with the requirements of this article and has been issued a license by the commissioner as provided in this article.

(b) The commissioner may issue to a rental car company, or to a franchisee of a rental car company, that has complied with the requirements of this article, a license that authorizes the rental car company or the franchisee of a rental car company to act as a car rental agent to offer or sell those types of insurance specified in Section 1758.85, in connection with and incidental to rental agreements, on behalf of any insurer
 authorized to write those types of insurance in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 31.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.81.

(a) An applicant for a car rental agent license under this article shall file the following documents with the commissioner:

(1) A written application for licensure, signed by the applicant or an officer of the applicant, in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(2) A certificate by the insurer that is to be named in the car rental agent license, stating that the insurer has satisfied itself that the named applicant is trustworthy and competent to act as its insurance agent limited to this purpose and that the insurer will appoint the applicant to act as its agent to transact the kind or kinds of insurance that are permitted by this article, if the car rental agent license applied for is issued by
 the commissioner. The certification shall be subscribed by an officer or managing agent of the insurer on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

(3) An application fee, and, each license period thereafter, a renewal fee, of four hundred sixty-three dollars ($463).

(4) Not less than 60 days before a permanent license will expire, the commissioner may use an electronic delivery method, including email or other similar electronic method of delivery, to deliver, or may mail, to the latest email or mailing address appearing on the licensee’s records, an application to the licensee to renew the license for the appropriate succeeding license period. It is the licensee’s responsibility to renew whether or not a renewal application is received. The commissioner may accept a late renewal without a penalty, provided the licensee’s failure to comply is due to clerical error or inadvertence on
 the part of the department.

(A) The application for renewal of a license shall be filed on or before the expiration date.

(B) The application for renewal of an expired license may be filed after the expiration date and until that same month and day of the next succeeding year. A licensee who files the renewal application after the license has expired shall be charged, in addition to the renewal fee, a penalty of 50 percent of the renewal fee.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, Sections 1667, 1668, 1668.5, 1669, 1670, 1720, 1738, and 1739 apply to any application for or issuance of a license pursuant to this article.

(c) Costs associated with any enforcement action or investigation shall be paid for by the person or organization licensed
 pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 32.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.82.

(a) An employee of a rental car company or franchisee of a rental car company that has been issued a car rental agent license pursuant to this article may be an endorsee authorized to offer insurance products under the authority of the car rental agent license if all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The employee is 18 years of age or older.

(2) The rental car company, at the time it submits its car rental agent license application pursuant to Section 1758.81, also establishes a list of the names of all endorsees to its car rental agent license. The list shall be maintained by the rental car company in a form prescribed by the commissioner and
 updated annually. The list shall be retained by the rental car company for three years and made available to the commissioner for review and inspection.

(3) The rental car company submits to the commissioner with its initial car rental agent license application and annually thereafter a certification, subscribed by an officer of the company on a form prescribed by the commissioner, stating all of the following:

(A) The number of endorsees offering insurance products under the authority of the car rental agent license for the applicable period.

(B) A statement that no person other than an endorsee sells or offers insurance on its behalf.

(C) That all endorsees have completed training as required by this article.

(b) Each rental car company licensed pursuant to this article shall provide for the training of its endorsees prior to allowing its endorsees to offer or sell insurance products. The training shall meet the following minimum standards:

(1) Each car rental endorsee shall receive instruction about the types of insurance specified in Section 1758.85 that are offered for sale to prospective renters.

(2) Each car rental endorsee shall receive training about ethical sales practices.

(3) Each car rental endorsee shall receive training about the disclosures to be given to prospective renters pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1758.86.

(c) Training materials used by or on behalf of the rental car
 company to train its endorsees shall be submitted to the department at the time the rental car company applies for a license under this article, and whenever modified thereafter. Any changes to previously submitted training materials shall be submitted to the department with the changes highlighted 30 days prior to their use by the licensee. Training materials and changes to those materials submitted to the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed approved for use by the company unless it is notified by the department to the contrary. Failure by a rental car company to submit training materials or changes for departmental review or use of unapproved or disapproved training materials shall constitute grounds for denial of an application for a license, nonrenewal of a license, or suspension of a license, as appropriate.

(d) The rental car company shall periodically retrain its endorsees on the subject matter described in
 subdivision (b), as prescribed by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 33.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.83.

(a) The manager at each location of a rental car company or a franchisee of a rental car company licensed pursuant to this article, or the direct supervisor of the company’s endorsees at each location or region shall be an endorsee and shall be responsible for the supervision of each additional endorsee at that location or region. Each licensee shall identify the endorsee who is the manager or supervisor at each location for the purposes of this article.

(b) An endorsee may act on behalf and under the supervision of the car rental agent in matters relating to transacting insurance under that agent’s license. The conduct of an endorsee of a car rental agent acting within the scope of employment or agency shall be deemed the
 conduct of the car rental agent for purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 34.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.84.

(a) If a licensee or endorsee violates any provision of this article or any other provision of this code, the commissioner may do any of the following:

(1) After notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the license of the car rental agent.

(2) After notice and hearing impose fines on the car rental agent for its conduct or that of its endorsees.

(3) After notice and hearing, impose other penalties, that the commissioner deems necessary and convenient to carry out the purpose of this code, including suspending the privilege of transacting insurance at specific rental locations where violations have
 occurred, and suspending or revoking the endorsement of individual endorsees or manager endorsees.

(b) If any person sells insurance in connection with, or incidental to, rental car agreements or claims to be or holds an organization out as a car rental agent without obtaining the license required by this article, or as being an endorsee when that person is not an endorsee, or as being licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1631) without obtaining that license, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order pursuant to Section 12921.8.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of Section 1748.5 are applicable to both the car rental agent and any endorsee to the license of the car rental agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 35.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.85.

A rental car company or franchisee licensed under this article may act as a car rental agent for an authorized insurer only in connection with the rental of vehicles and only with respect to the following kinds of insurance:

(a) Personal accident insurance for renters and other rental vehicle occupants, for accidental death or dismemberment, and for medical expenses resulting from an accident that occurs with the rental vehicle during the rental period.

(b) Liability insurance, which may include uninsured motorist coverage, whether offered separately or in combination with other liability insurance, that provides coverage to the renters and to other authorized drivers of a rental
 vehicle and is nonduplicative of any standard liability coverage or self-insurance limits provided by the rental company in its rental agreement, for liability arising from the negligent operation of the rental vehicle during the rental period.

(c) Personal effects insurance that provides coverage to renters and other vehicle occupants for loss of, or damage to, personal effects in the rental vehicle during the rental period.

(d) Roadside assistance insurance.

(e) Emergency sickness insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 36.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.851.
